District of Columbia statutes.
47-1319

Disposition of redemption moneys.

All moneys paid or deposited according to law, for the redemption of property sold for taxes, shall be paid by the accounting and disbursing officers of the District to the person or persons entitled to receive it, on the presentation of the certificate of the Collector.

Leg. Assem., Jan. 19, 1872, ch. 31, § 4
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
1981 Ed., § 47-1319.
1973 Ed., § 47-1018.

Disbursing Office abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 47-111.

Office of Collector of Taxes abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 47-401.